Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.140

Reissuance of lost or destroyed certificates.

A new certificate of licensure to replace any certificate lost or destroyed, or mutilated may be issued by the director, and a charge determined by the director as provided in RCW 43.24.086 shall be made for such issuance.

[ 2009 c 370 s 13; 2002 c 86 s 236; 1985 c 7 s 77; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 88; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.